Florida, session 2026, SB172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âAvaâs Law.â 43 Section 2.âSection 907.033, Florida Statutes, is created to 44 read: 45 907.033âPregnancy testing of female arrestees.âUpon her 46 request, a female arrested and not released on bond within 72 47 hours after arrest must be administered a pregnancy test by the 48 municipal detention facility or county detention facility, as 49 those terms are defined in s. 951.23, where she is being held 50 within 24 hours after such request is made. During booking into 51 the facility, the facility must notify each such arrestee of her 52 right to request that she be administered a pregnancy test 53 within 72 hours after arrest if she is still in custody. The 54 pregnancy test may be administered by collection of urine or 55 blood samples, by ultrasound scan, or by any other standard 56 pregnancy testing protocols adopted by the facility. As used in 57 this section, the term âfemaleâ means a juvenile girl or an 58 adult woman. 59 Section 3.âSection 925.13, Florida Statutes, is created to 60 read: 61 925.13âStaying of sentence for pregnant women.â 62 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âpregnant womanâ 63 means a juvenile girl or an adult woman whose pregnancy has been 64 verified by a pregnancy test or through a medical examination 65 conducted by a health care practitioner. 66 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, when a pregnant woman is 67 convicted of any offense and the sentencing court pronounces a 68 sentence of incarceration, the court has the discretion to stay 69 the beginning of the period of incarceration for up to 12 weeks 70 after the pregnant woman gives birth or is no longer pregnant. 71 In determining whether to grant a pregnant womanâs request to 72 stay the beginning of the period of incarceration, the court 73 shall consider all of the following: 74 (a)âThe severity of the offense for which the defendant is 75 convicted. 76 (b)âWhether the defendant was previously convicted of a 77 felony. 78 (c)âWhether other felony charges are pending against the 79 defendant. 80 (d)âThe stateâs interest in deterring and punishing 81 criminal activity and protecting the public. 82 (e)âThe rights of the victim of the defendantâs crime, 83 consistent with s. 16, Art. I of the State Constitution and s. 84 960.0021. 85 (f)âWhether staying the incarceration is consistent with 86 protecting the life, health, and safety of the unborn child and 87 its life during the first 12 weeks after birth. In considering 88 this factor, the court shall consider the existence of any prior 89 substance abuse by the defendant, whether any other children of 90 the defendant have been adjudicated dependent, and any other 91 information relevant to the health and safety of the unborn 92 child. 93 94 If the court grants a request to stay incarceration, it must 95 explain its reasons in writing. 96 (3)âThe sentencing court may order a pregnant woman whose 97 incarceration is stayed to comply with any of the terms and 98 conditions specified in s. 948.03 until such time as she is 99 incarcerated. 100 (4)âWithin 10 days after the end of the stay of 101 incarceration and the commencement of the womanâs incarceration 102 to serve the sentence, she must be offered an appropriate 103 assessment by a licensed health care practitioner or a 104 telehealth provider as defined in s. 456.47 who, upon her 105 request, shall provide a postpartum assessment, including any 106 necessary medical tests, procedures, lactation support, mental 107 health support, or treatments associated with her postpartum 108 condition. The Department of Corrections, municipal detention 109 facilities, and county detention facilities shall develop and 110 offer such assessments and treatments in consultation with local 111 and state governmental agencies, licensed health care 112 practitioners, social services programs, and community support 113 organizations, including nonprofit organizations. 114 (5)âIf, during the stay of incarceration, the pregnant 115 woman is convicted of another crime or violates any of the 116 conditions imposed by the sentencing judge, the judge may impose 117 any sanction under s. 948.06, including an order requiring the 118 incarceration of the pregnant woman for the purpose of serving 119 the sentence for which the stay was granted. 120 (6)(a)âThe Department of Corrections shall collect from its 121 own institutions, and each municipal detention facility and 122 county detention facility as those terms are defined in s. 123 951.23 shall collect and report to the department, all of the 124 following information, which the department shall compile and 125 publish quarterly on its public website: 126 1.âThe total number of pregnant women whose sentences are 127 stayed under subsection (2). 128 2.âThe total number of births, including the number of live 129 births and stillbirths, to women whose sentences are stayed, and 130 the gestational age and birth weight of each infant at the time 131 of birth or stillbirth. 132 3.âThe total number of women who experience complications 133 during pregnancy and the type of complications experienced. 134 4.âThe total number of women who experience miscarriages. 135 5.âThe total number of women who refuse to provide 136 information regarding the outcome of their pregnancies as 137 indicated in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. 138 (b)âThe information published pursuant to paragraph (a) 139 must exclude personal identifying information and must comply 140 with state and federal confidentiality laws. 141 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.